src/nounLexcErz.lexc
LEXICON Indef-DefSg-Poss
+Indef: Tenses-Obl ;
+DefSg:^О1нть Clitics ;
+Poss1Sg:^О1нУ4 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON Nouns_Voiceless
Nouns_Pl ;
Nouns_Shibilant ;


LEXICON Nouns_Shibilant
+Ill+Indef:^с Clitics ;
+Ine:^сО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ela:^стО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

LEXICON Nouns_Pl
+Indet+Pl:^тУ4 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Abe:^тне^втеме Tenses-Obl  ;
+Pl.DefPl+Abl:^тне^де Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Com:^тне^нек Clitics ;
+Pl.DefPl+Comp:^тне^шка Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Dat:^тне^нень Clitics ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ela:^тне^стэ Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Gen:^тне^нь Clitics ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ill:^тне^с Clitics ;
+Pl.DefPl+Ine:^тне^сэ Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Lat:^тне^в Clitics ;
+Pl.DefPl+Nom:^тне Tenses-NomPl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Prol:^тне^ва Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl.DefPl+Transl:^тне^кс Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON Nouns1_A
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+Abe:^втО1мО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abl:^дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:^О1шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prol:^Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Transl:^О1кс Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Ill:^О1з Possessives2 ;

+Temporal:^не Clitics ;
+Lat+Indef:^О1в Clitics ;

+Dat+Indef:^нень Clitics ;
+Dat+Poss1Sg:^нень Clitics ;
+Dat+Poss2Sg:^тень Clitics ;
+Dat+Poss3:^О1нстэнь Clitics ;



+NomDefSg:^О1сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+GenDefSg:^О1нть Clitics ;
+DatDefSg:^О1нтень Clitics ;
+Gen+Indef:^О1нь Tenses-Obl ;
+Com+Indef:^нек Clitics ;

+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:^теть Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:^те Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss+3:^О1нстО1 Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Pl:^О1нстэнк Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Sg:^О1нстэнзэ Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:^О1нстэнст Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:^О1нстэст Clitics ;
+Dial+Ill:^з Possessives2 ;

+Dial+NomSg+Poss3Sg:^зО1 Tenses-NomSg ;

+Dial+NomSg+Poss1Pl:^нО1к Tenses-NomSg ;
+Dial+NomPl+Poss1Pl:^нО1к Tenses-NomPl ;
+Dial+Gen+Poss1Pl:^нО1к Tenses-Obl ;

+Dial+NomDefSg:^сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+Dial+GenDefSg:^сть Clitics ;
+Dial+DatDefSg:^стень Clitics ;


LEXICON Possessive-NomGen
+NomSg+Poss1Sg/м:^О1м Tenses-NomSg ;
+Dial+NomPl+Poss1Sg/м:^О1м Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg/м:^О1м Tenses-Obl ;

+NomPl+Poss1Sg/Н:^О1нУ4 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss1Sg/Н:^О1нУ4 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss1Sg+KinGen:^О1нь Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Tenses-Obl ;
+Poss2Sg+KinGen:^О1ть Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss3Sg:^О1зО1 Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss3Sg:^О1нзО1 Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Tenses-Obl ;
+Dial+NomSg+Poss1Pl:^О1мО1к Tenses-NomSg ;

+NomSg+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Tenses-Obl ;

+NomSg+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Tenses-NomSg ;
+NomPl+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Tenses-NomPl ;
+Gen+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Tenses-Obl ;



!!!!!!!!Nouns1S_A
!HERE
LEXICON Nouns1S_A_ReqVow
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+LVStem+Ine:^О1сО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+LVStem+Ela:^О1стО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+LVStem+Comp:^О1шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+LVStem+Ill:^О1с Clitics ;

+Lat+Indef:^О1в Clitics ;


+NoLVStem+Ine:^сО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+NoLVStem+Ela:^стО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+NoLVStem+Comp:^шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Transl:^О1кс Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+NoLVStem+Ill:^с Clitics ;

+LVStem+Dial+GenDefSg:^О1сть Clitics ;
+LVStem+Dial+DatDefSg:^О1стень Clitics ;
+Dat+Poss+3:^О1нстэнь Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss+3:^О1нстО1 Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Sg:^О1нстэнзэ Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:^О1нстэнст Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:^О1нстэст Clitics ;


+NomDefSg:^О1сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+GenDefSg:^О1нть Clitics ;
+DatDefSg:^О1нтень Clitics ;
+Gen+Indef:^О1нь Tenses-Obl ;



LEXICON Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow
+Abl:^дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prol:^Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abe:^втО1мО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:^теть Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:^те Clitics ;
+Dat+Poss2Sg:^тень Clitics ;
+Dat+Poss1Sg:^нень Clitics ;


+Dat:^нень Clitics ;
+Com:^нек Clitics ;
+Temporal:^не Clitics ;
!!This one would render voiceless "s"
+Dial+Ill:^з Possessives2 ;
+Dial+Sg+Nom+Poss3Sg:^зО1 Tenses-NomSg ;
Nouns_Pl ;




!!!!!!!!Nouns2_A
LEXICON Nouns2-a
 Possessive-NomGen ;

+Dat+Poss1Sg:^нень Clitics ;
+Dat+Poss2Sg:^тень Clitics ;
+Dat:^нень Clitics ;
+Com:^нек Clitics ;
+Temporal:^не Clitics ;
+Abe:^втО1мО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Abl:^дО1 Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Comp:^О1шка Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Prol:^Г2а Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Transl:^О1кс Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

+Lat+Indef:^О1в Clitics ;
+Ill:^О1з Possessives2 ;
+Dat+Poss+3:^О1нстэнь Clitics ;

+NomDefSg:^О1сь Tenses-NomSg ;
+GenDefSg:^О1нть Clitics ;
+DatDefSg:^О1нтень Clitics ;
+Gen+Indef:^О1нь Tenses-Obl ;

+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:^теть Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss2Sg:^те Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss+3:^О1нстО1 Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Sg:^О1нстэнзэ Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:^О1нстэнст Clitics ;
+Dial+Dat+Poss3Pl:^О1нстэст Clitics ;


LEXICON Gen-Attributes
+ZeroSuf: Clitics ; !This means that stem is word final !!!
+LV:^О1 Gen-Attributes_1 ; !
+NoLV:^ Gen-Attributes_1 ; !

LEXICON Gen-Attributes_1

+Abl+Indef:^дО1 Clitics ;
+Indet+GenIndef:^О1нь Tenses-Obl ;
+OrthOld+GenIndef+SOD:^О1нсе Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthMorph+GenIndef+SOD:^О1ньсе Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthPhon+GenIndef+SOD:^О1нце Nouns3-1 ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Possessives1
+Indet+NoPossPx: Tenses-Obl ;
 Possessives2 ;

LEXICON Possessives2
+Dial+Poss1Sg/м:^О1м Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Sg/Н+NonNomSg:^О1нУ4 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Sg:^О1тУ4 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Sg+NonNomSg:^О1нзО1 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Pl:^О1нО1к Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Pl:^О1нк Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl:^О1ст Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl:^О1нст Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Determinatives1
+SOD:^се Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthPhon+SOD:^це Nouns3-1 ;
 Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON Tenses-NomSg
+NoPredx: Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+1Sg:^А2н Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+2Sg:^А2т Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+3Sg: Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+1Sg:^О1линь Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+2Sg:^О1лить Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+3Sg:^О1ль Clitics ;

LEXICON Tenses-NomPl
+NoPredx: Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:^тА2но Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:^тА2до Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+3Pl: Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:^О1линек Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+2Pl:^О1лиде Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:^О1льть Clitics ;

LEXICON Tenses-Abs
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:^О1линек Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+2Pl:^О1лиде Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:^О1льть Clitics ;
Tenses-Abs-1 ;

LEXICON Tenses-Abs-1
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:^тА2но Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:^тА2до Clitics ;

LEXICON Tenses-Obl
+NoPredx: Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+1Sg:^А2н Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+2Sg:^А2т Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+3Sg: Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+1Sg:^О1линь Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+2Sg:^О1лить Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+3Sg:^О1ль Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:^тА2но Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:^тА2до Clitics ;
+Pred+Pres+3Pl:^тУ4 Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:^О1линек Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+2Pl:^О1лиде Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:^О1льть Clitics ;


LEXICON Clitics
+CltGak:^Г1ак # ;
+NoClitic:0 # ;



END




"@C.NUM@"
"@C.BUTI@"
"@C.KLOSS@"
"@C.TLOSS@"

LEXICON Root
класс+Indet+Ine:классо Clitics ;
класс+Indet+Ela:классто Clitics ;
класс+Ine+DefSg:классонть Clitics ;
класс+Ela+DefSg:класстонть Clitics ;
апарсте+Neg+Adv:апарсте Clitics ;
весемнень+Pron+Q+Dat:весемнень Clitics ;
знярт+Pron+Q+Pl:знярт Clitics ;
колмоненек+Num+Coll+1Pl:колмоненек Clitics ;
кондякс+Pron+Transl:кондякс Clitics ;
пееньбачк+Adv:пееньбачк Clitics ;
чиньзельть+Prt+Temp+Pl:чиньзельть Clitics ;
ёжомарязь+Adv:ёжомарязь Clitics ;
трубком+Adv:трубком Clitics ;
штюпком+Adv:штюпком Clitics ;
эрейстэ+Adv:эрейстэ Clitics ;
аламонь-аламонь+Adv+Distr:аламонь-аламонь Clitics ;
аловбандт+Adv:аловбандт Clitics ;
аловпандт+Adv:аловпандт Clitics ;
апак+Prt+Neg:апак Tenses-Obl ;
бишь+Prt+ForeignNew:бишь Clitics ;
вейс+Adv+Ill:вейс Clitics ;
веревбандт+Adv:веревбандт Clitics ;
веревпандт+Adv:веревпандт Clitics ;
дюм+Ad-A:дюм Gen-Attributes ;
икеле+Adv+Temp+Indet+Gen+Abl+Indef:икеленде Clitics ;
истяко+Adv:истяко Clitics ;
истя+Adv:истя Gen-Attributes ;
истяня+Adv:истяня Clitics ;
ки+Noun+Prol:киява Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
ковия+Adv+Spatial+Lat+Prt:ковия Clitics ;
куватьс+Adv+Temp+Ill:куватьс Clitics ;
лацо+Prt+OldOrth+Ine:лацо Gen-Attributes ;
маныть+Adv+Temp:маныть Gen-Attributes ;
мейгенерть+Adv+Manner:мейгенерть Clitics ;
мейле+Adv+Temp:мейле Clitics ;
мекевлангт+Adv:мекевлангт Clitics ;
мекевланк+Adv+OldOrth:мекевланк Clitics ;
мелят+Adv+Temp:мелят Gen-Attributes ;
мелень+Adv+Temp+Gen:мелень Clitics ;
можна+Adv+Foreign:можна Tenses-Obl ;
нацяс+Prt+Ill:нацяс Clitics ;
овсе+Prt:овсе Clitics ;
овсе+Dial+Prt:овси Clitics ;
окойники+Adv+Temp:окойники Gen-Attributes ;
пек+Ad-A:пек Gen-Attributes ;
пецек+Adv+Coll:пецек Gen-Attributes ;
рана+Adv+Temp:рана Gen-Attributes ;
салава+Prt+Prol:салава Gen-Attributes ;
састо+Adv:састо Gen-Attributes ;
седе+Prt:седе Clitics ;
семс+Pron+Temp+Ill:семс Clitics ;
сеньсэ+Pron+Gen+Ine:сеньсэ Clitics ;
сеньстэ+Pron+Gen+Ela:сеньстэ Clitics ;
сеедьстэ+Adv+Temp:сеедьстэ Gen-Attributes ;
сеедьстэ+Adv+Temp+OldOrth:сеетьстэ Gen-Attributes ;
сёксня+Prt:сёксня Gen-Attributes ;
тев+Adv+Spatial:тев Clitics ;
тезэ+Pron+Adv+Ill:тезэ Clitics ;
тезэнь+Pron+Adv+Ill:тезэнь Clitics ;
тей+Adv+Spatial+Lat:тей Clitics ;
тельня+Prt+Temp:тельня Gen-Attributes ;
теньсэ+Pron+Gen+Ine:теньсэ Clitics ;
теньстэ+Pron+Gen+Ela:теньстэ Clitics ;
течимс+Adv+Ill:течимс Clitics ;
тов+Adv+Spatial+Lat:тов Clitics ;
тозо+Adv+Dial+Spatial+Ill:тозо Clitics ;
тозонь+Adv+Spatial+Ill:тозонь Clitics ;
тунда+Prt:тунда Gen-Attributes ;
улкоть+Prt+Temp:улкоть Gen-Attributes ;
чокшне+Prt+Temp:чокшне Gen-Attributes ;
чокшнэ+Prt+Temp:чокшнэ Gen-Attributes ;
чопоньбелев+Adv+Lat:чопоньбелев Gen-Attributes ;
чопоньбелес+Adv+Ill:чопоньбелес Clitics ;
авидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:авиде Possessives2 ;
васолбодидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:васолбодиде Possessives2 ;
лелидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:лелиде Possessives2 ;
тетидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:тетиде Possessives2 ;
кис+Postp+Ill:кис Clitics ;
коряс+Postp+Ill:коряс Clitics ;
коряс+Postp:корязо Possessives2 ;
кувалт+Postp:кувалт Clitics ;
кувалма+Postp:кувалма Possessives1 ;
перть+Postp:перть Clitics ;
эйс+Postp+Ill:эйс Clitics ;
эйс+Postp+Ill:эйзэ Possessives2 ;
эйс+Postp+Ill+OldOrth:эзэзэ Possessives2 ;
эйстэде+Postp+Ela+Abl:эйстэде Possessives2 ;
эська+Postp+Prol:эська Possessives2 ;
